Utah statutes.
31A-4-105.   Deposit required from domestic insurers.

Domestic insurers organized or operating under Chapter 5, 7, or 9 shall maintain a deposit under Section 31A-2-206 in the amount of the insurer's required capital for stock insurers, or minimum permanent surplus for mutuals.  The commissioner may not issue a certificate of authority to an insurer operating under one of these chapters until the insurer complies with this section.

